Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
291D]

ADJUDICATION
OF TRAFFIC INFRACTIONS

Section

291D-1 Purpose

291D-2 Definitions

291D-3 Applicability

291D-3.5 U-drive vehicles; traffic infractions

291D-4 Venue and jurisdiction

291D-5 Notice of traffic infraction; form; determination

final unless contested

291D-6 Answer required

291D-7 Court action after answer or failure to
answer

291D-8 Hearings

291D-9 Monetary assessments

291D-10 Restriction on driver's license and motor
vehicle

registration

291D-11 Time computation

291D-12 Powers of the district court judge sitting
in the

traffic division

291D-13 Trial and concurrent trial

291D-14 Rules

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next